Montana, session 2025, SB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Political mailings opt-out website. (1) The commissioner shall provide
and maintain a public website for individuals to opt out of receiving mail from political campaigns.
(2) The commissioner shall make the list of individuals who are opting out of receiving mail from
political campaigns available to political committees and political party organizations as those terms are defined
in 13-1-101.
(3) The commissioner is authorized to establish a fee that is commensurate with costs for
maintaining the website.
(4) The commissioner shall collect the fee equally from all political committees and political party
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Political mailings opt-out website state special revenue account. (1)
There is a political mailings opt-out website account in the state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102.
(2) There must be deposited in the account money received from the collection of fees from
political committees and political party organizations.
(3) Money in the account must be used to maintain the political mailings opt-out website.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 557

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 557.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 13, chapter 37, part 1, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, part 1, apply to
[sections 1 and 2].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 557